Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2905
Advisory Council on Dispute Resolution; created; members.

The Advisory Council on Dispute Resolution is hereby created. The council shall be comprised of individuals from a variety of disciplines who are trained and knowledgeable in mediation, restorative justice, and dispute resolution and selected to be representative of the geographical and cultural diversity of the state and to reflect gender fairness. The council shall consist of fifteen voting members. The membership shall include a district court judge, county court judge, and juvenile court judge and a representative from the Office of Probation Administration, the Nebraska State Bar Association, and the Nebraska County Attorneys Association. Nominations for the remaining members may be solicited from such entities and from the Nebraska Mediation Association, the Public Counsel, social workers, mental health professionals, diversion program administrators, educators, law enforcement entities, crime victim advocates, and former participants in restorative justice programs and related fields. The council shall be appointed by the Supreme Court or its designee. The Supreme Court or its designee shall not be restricted to the solicited list of nominees in making its appointments. Two nonvoting, ex officio members shall be appointed by the council from among the approved centers.

Laws 1991, LB 90, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 315, § 2;

Laws 2019, LB595, § 5.